test/src/gt-desc-yamls/YAMLtestNouns_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - စာအုပ် - ok : # -Book; a noun
    စာအုပ်+N+Pl+Sub: စာအုပ်များက 
    စာအုပ်+N+Sub: စာအုပ်က 
    စာအုပ်+N+Pl: စာအုပ်များ 
    စာအုပ်+N+Pl+Obj: စာအုပ်များကို
    စာအုပ်+N+Obj: စာအုပ်ကို
    
